California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) For the purposes of Section 99, in the case of a jurisdictional change that results in a qualifying city, as defined in Section 98, providing its own fire protection services in accordance with Section 25643 of the Government Code in lieu of the county providing those services, the negotiated exchange of property tax revenues between the county and the qualifying city pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99 as a result of that jurisdictional change may also provide for a negotiated adjustment in the amount of property tax revenue distributed by the auditor to the qualifying city in accordance with Section 98. The negotiated adjustment may be made in any amount that does not exceed the amount of property tax revenue exchanged between the county and the qualifying city.

(b) This section applies only to exchanges of property tax revenue affecting the County of Riverside and qualifying cities within that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

99.1.

(a) For the purposes of the computations required by this chapter for the 1986–87 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, in the case of any transfer of property tax revenues between local agencies that is adopted and approved in conformity with subdivisions (b) and (c), the county auditor shall adjust the allocation of property tax revenue determined pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, or the annual tax increment determined pursuant to Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, for those local agencies whose allocation would be altered by the transfer.

(b) Commencing with the 1986–87 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter, a local agency may, by the adoption of a resolution of its governing board, determine to exchange any portion of its property tax revenues that is allocable to one or more tax rate areas, with one or more other local agencies having the same tax rate area or tax rate areas. Upon the adoption of the resolution, the governing board of the local agency shall notify the board of supervisors of the affected county.

If the transfer of property tax revenues will alter the property tax revenue allocation of a city, the governing board of the local agency shall, upon adoption of the resolution, also notify the affected city.

(c) If the board of supervisors of the affected county concurs with the proposed exchange of property tax revenues, it shall, by resolution, approve the exchange and notify the county auditor. If the property tax allocation of a city would be affected by the exchange, the board shall not notify the county auditor pursuant to this subdivision until the city council of the affected city has, by resolution, approved the proposed exchange of property tax revenues.

(d) Upon receipt of notification from the board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (c), the county auditor shall make the necessary adjustments specified in subdivision (a).

(e) Prior to the adoption by the governing board of a local agency of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), the local agency shall hold a public hearing to consider the effect of the proposed transfer. Notice of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the local agency.

(f) No local agency shall reallocate property tax revenue pursuant to this section unless the transfer will not result in any increase in the ratio between the amount of revenues of the transferring agency that are generated by regulatory licenses, use charges, user fees, or assessments and the amount of revenues of the transferring agency used to finance services provided by it.

(g) This section applies only to exchanges affecting the Ventura Regional Sanitation District located within the County of Ventura.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

99.2.

No amendment made by any chapter of the Statutes of 1980, or any year thereafter, to Section 99 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be construed, except as expressly provided therein, to apply to a jurisdictional change initiated, pursuant to the applicable provisions of law governing those jurisdictional changes, prior to the effective date of the amendment. The provisions of Section 99 of the Revenue and Taxation Code in effect at the time the jurisdictional change is initiated shall govern the procedures for, and exchange of, property tax revenues between local agencies whose service area or service responsibility would be altered by that jurisdictional change, provided that there shall be no duty to impound any property tax revenues.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

99.3.

(a) The plan for financing services that is included with a resolution of application for change of organization or reorganization filed by a local agency pursuant to Section 56653 of the Government Code for a disadvantaged, unincorporated community may include an annexation development plan that has been adopted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local agency” means a local agency as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 95, and does not include any school entity as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95.

(2) “Consenting local agency” means a local agency that has adopted a resolution of its governing body consenting to the annexation development plan.

(3) “Territory” means all or part of the land that is included in the resolution of application for change of organization or reorganization filed by the local agency.

(4) “Certificate of completion” is defined as provided in Section 56020.5 of the Government Code.

(5) “Disadvantaged, unincorporated community” is defined as provided in Section 56033.5 of the Government Code.

(c) A local agency that files a resolution of application for a change of organization or reorganization, and one or more other consenting local agencies that will improve or upgrade structures to serve a disadvantaged,
 unincorporated community subject to that resolution of application, may agree on an annexation development plan for financing services and structures pursuant to this section.

(d) The annexation development plan agreed upon pursuant to subdivision (c) may contain a provision that taxes levied upon taxable property in the area included within the territory each year by or for the benefit of the local agency and one or more other consenting local agencies that consent to the annexation development plan, be divided as follows:

(1) That portion of the taxes that would have been produced by the rate upon which the tax is levied each year by or for each of the consenting local agencies upon the total sum of the assessed value of the taxable property in the territory as shown upon the assessment roll used in connection with the taxation of the property by the consenting local agency,
 last equalized prior to the effective date of the certification of completion, and that portion of taxes by or for each school entity, shall be allocated to, and when collected shall be paid to, the respective consenting local agencies and school entities as taxes by or for the consenting local agencies and school entities on all property are paid.

(2) That portion of the levied taxes each year specified in the annexation development plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) for the city and each consenting local agency that has agreed to participate pursuant to this section, in excess of the amount specified in paragraph (1), shall be allocated to, and when collected shall be paid into a special fund of a special district formed or reorganized with the special district’s consent pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56653 of the Government Code that will finance the infrastructure improvements, including, but not limited to, water, wastewater,
 and stormwater systems and local streets, roads, and sidewalks, to serve the disadvantaged, unincorporated community. A consenting local agency may advance funds to the special district that is formed or reorganized pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 56653 of the Government Code. The special district shall use those advanced funds solely for the purposes specified in the annexation development plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) and shall repay the consenting local agency with revenue from the taxes received pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) An annexation development plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) shall specify a date upon which the division of taxes described in subdivision (d) shall terminate.

(f) An annexation development plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) may include a provision for the issuance of indebtedness. Any indebtedness shall
 be issued in conformity with Articles 4.5 (commencing with Section 53506) and 5 (commencing with Section 53510) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code or the principal act of the special district.

(g) An annexation development plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not result in a reduction of property tax revenues allocated to any school entity as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95.

(h) Any plan adopted pursuant to this section shall not include any portion of a redevelopment project area which is or has been previously created pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2025, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 784, Sec. 4.   (SB 614)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [100. - 100.96.]

100.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing with the 1988–89 fiscal year, property tax assessed value attributable to unitary and operating nonunitary property, as defined in Sections 723 and 723.1, that is assessed by the State Board of Equalization shall be allocated by county as provided in Section 756, and the assessed value and revenues attributable to that allocation shall be allocated within each county as follows:

(a) Each county shall establish one countywide tax rate area. The assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property shall be assigned to this tax rate area. No other property shall be assigned to this tax rate area.

(b) Property assigned to
 the tax rate area created by subdivision (a) shall be taxed at a rate equal to the sum of the following two rates:

(1) A rate determined by dividing the county’s total ad valorem tax levies for the secured roll, including levies made pursuant to Section 96.8, for the prior year, exclusive of levies for debt service, by the county’s total ad valorem secured roll assessed value for the prior year.

(2) A rate determined as follows:

(A) By dividing the county’s total ad valorem tax levies for unitary and operating nonunitary property for the prior year debt service only by the county’s total unitary and operating nonunitary assessed value for the prior year.

(B) Beginning with the 1989–90 fiscal year, adjusting the rate determined pursuant to subparagraph
 (A) by the percentage change between the two preceding fiscal years in the county’s ad valorem debt service levy for the secured roll, not including unitary and operating nonunitary debt service.

(c) The property tax revenue derived from the assessed value assigned to the countywide tax rate area pursuant to subdivision (a) and pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 100.1 by the use of the tax rate determined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be allocated as follows:

(1) For the 1988–89 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, each taxing jurisdiction shall be allocated an amount of property tax revenue equal to 102 percent of the amount of the aggregate property tax revenue it received from all unitary and operating nonunitary property in the prior fiscal year, exclusive of revenue attributable to qualified property under Sections 100.95 and 100.96
 and levies for debt service.

(2) If the amount of property tax revenue available for allocation in the current fiscal year is insufficient to make the allocations required by paragraph (1), the amount of revenue to be allocated to each taxing jurisdiction shall be prorated based on a factor determined by dividing the total amount of property tax revenue available to all taxing jurisdictions from unitary and operating nonunitary property in the current year, exclusive of revenue attributable to levies for debt service, by the total amount of property tax revenue received by all taxing jurisdictions from unitary and operating nonunitary property in the prior fiscal year, exclusive of revenue attributable to levies for debt service.

(3) If the amount of property tax revenue available for allocation to all taxing jurisdictions in the current fiscal year from unitary and operating
 nonunitary property, exclusive of revenue attributable to qualified property under Sections 100.95 and 100.96 and levies for debt service, exceeds 102 percent of the property tax revenue received by all taxing jurisdictions from all unitary and operating nonunitary property in the prior fiscal year, exclusive of revenue attributable to qualified property under Sections 100.95 and 100.96 and levies for debt service, the amount of revenue in excess of 102 percent shall be allocated to all taxing jurisdictions in the county by a ratio determined by dividing each taxing jurisdiction’s share of the county’s total ad valorem tax levies for the secured roll for the prior year, exclusive of levies for qualified property under Sections 100.95 and 100.96 and levies for debt service, by the county’s total ad valorem tax levies for the secured roll for the prior year, exclusive of levies for qualified property under Sections 100.95 and 100.96 and levies for debt service.

(d) The property tax revenue derived from the assessed value assigned to the countywide tax rate area pursuant to subdivision (a) and pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 100.1 by the use of the tax rate determined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be allocated as follows:

(1) An amount shall be computed for each taxing jurisdiction and shall be determined by multiplying the amounts required in the current year pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 93 by that percentage that shall be determined by dividing the amount of property tax revenue the jurisdiction received in the prior year from unitary property and operating nonunitary property by the total amount of property tax revenue the jurisdiction received in the prior year from all property.

(2) The amount of property tax revenue
 available for allocation pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated among taxing jurisdictions in the proportion that the amount computed for each taxing jurisdiction pursuant to paragraph (1) bears to the total amount computed pursuant to paragraph (1) for all taxing jurisdictions.

(3) If a taxing jurisdiction is levying a tax rate for debt service for the first time in the current fiscal year, for purposes of determining the percentage specified in paragraph (1), that percentage shall be the percentage determined by dividing the amount of property tax revenue received by that taxing jurisdiction in the prior year pursuant to subdivision (c) from unitary and operating nonunitary property by the total amount of property tax revenue received by that taxing jurisdiction in the prior year from all property within the taxing jurisdiction.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “The county’s total ad valorem tax levies for the secured roll” means all ad valorem tax levies for the county’s secured roll, including the general tax levy, levies for debt service (including land only and land and improvement rates), and levies for redevelopment agencies.

(2) “The county’s total ad valorem secured roll” means the county’s local roll, after all exemptions except the homeowner’s exemption, and the county’s utility roll.

(3) “Taxing jurisdiction” includes a redevelopment agency.

(4) In a county of the second class, for the 1992–93 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, “taxing jurisdiction” includes that fund that has been designated by the auditor as the “Unallocated Residual Public Utility Tax Fund.” All revenues allocated to
 that fund pursuant to this section shall be deposited in that fund and shall be distributed as follows:

(A) For the 1992–93 fiscal year to the 1996–97 fiscal year, inclusive, at the discretion of the county board of supervisors.

(B) For the 1997–98 fiscal year, 100 percent to the Orange County Fire Authority.

(C) For the 1998–99 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) Fifty-seven and forty-seven hundredths percent to the Orange County Fire Authority.

(ii) Forty-one and forty-seven hundredths percent to the Orange County Library District.

(iii) Forty-eight hundredths percent
 to the Buena Park Library District.

(iv) Fifty-eight hundredths percent to the Placentia Library District.

(f) The assessed value of the unitary and operating nonunitary property shall be kept separate for each state assessee throughout the allocation process.

(g) Each state assessee shall be issued only one tax bill for all unitary and operating nonunitary property within the county.

(h) This section applies to the unitary property of regulated railway companies only to the extent described in Section 100.1.

(i) This section does not apply to property that on July 1, 1987, was undeveloped and owned by a utility and located within a city, county, or city and county that adopts a resolution
 stating that the property is subject to a development plan or agreement and that this section shall not apply to that property, and the city, county, or city and county transmits a copy of that resolution, including a legal description of the property, to the State Board of Equalization and the county’s auditor-controller prior to January 1, 1988.

(j) (1) For property that on July 1, 1990, was undeveloped and owned by a utility and that is located within a city, county, or city and county that adopts a resolution stating that the property is subject to a development plan or agreement and that this subdivision applies to that property, and the city, county, or city and county transmits a copy of that resolution, including a legal description of the property, to the county auditor prior to August 1, 1991, the allocation of property tax revenues derived with respect to that property pursuant to Sections 96.1, 96.2, 97.31, 98,
 98.01, and 98.04, shall be subject to the allocation required by paragraph (2).

(2) The county auditor shall annually allocate to a city, county, or city and county, that has adopted and transmitted a resolution pursuant to paragraph (1), the amount of property tax revenues derived with respect to the property described in paragraph (1) that would be allocated to that city, county, or city and county if that property were subject to assessment by the county assessor. In order to provide the allocations required by this paragraph, the county auditor shall make any necessary pro rata reductions in allocations to local agencies other than that city, county, or city and county adopting and transmitting a resolution pursuant to paragraph (1), of property tax revenues derived with respect to the property described in paragraph (1).

(k) (1) For property subject to
 this section that is owned by a utility that serves no more than two counties and is located within a city, county, or city and county that adopts a resolution stating that the property is subject to a development plan or agreement for new construction and the city, county, or city and county transmits a copy of that resolution, including a legal description of the property, to the State Board of Equalization and the county auditor prior to January 1, 2006, the allocation of property tax revenues derived with respect to that property pursuant to Sections 96.1, 97.31, 98, 98.01, and 98.04, shall be subject to the requirements of paragraph (2).

(2) If the city, county, or city and county has adopted and transmitted a resolution pursuant to paragraph (1), the county auditor shall annually allocate the property tax revenue attributable to the new construction described in the development plan or agreement, as if that new construction were subject
 to assessment by the county assessor, according to the following formula:

(A) An amount of property tax revenue to school entities, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95, equivalent to the same percentage the school entities received in the prior fiscal year of the property tax revenues paid by the utility in the county in which the property described in paragraph (1) is located.

(B) An amount of property tax revenue to the county in which the property is located equivalent to the same percentage the county received in the prior fiscal year of the property tax revenues paid by the utility in the county in which the property described in paragraph (1) is located. The county shall distribute those property tax revenues to the county general fund, the county library district, the county flood control district, the county sanitation districts, and the county service areas.

(C) The property tax revenue remaining after the allocations described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) are made shall be distributed to the city in which the property described in paragraph (1) is located.

(3) In order to provide the allocations required by paragraph (2), the county auditor shall make any necessary pro rata reductions in allocations of property taxes attributable to the property specified in paragraph (1) to jurisdictions other than those receiving an allocation under paragraph (2).

(l) (1) For property subject to this section that is owned by a utility that was constructed by a wholly owned subsidiary of the utility prior to January 1, 2007, and placed in service by the utility on or after January 1, 2007, and the property is located within a redevelopment project area of a joint
 powers authority comprised of cities and a county that adopts a resolution stating that the property is subject to a redevelopment plan and the joint powers authority transmits a copy of that resolution, including a legal description of the property, to the State Board of Equalization and the county auditor prior to January 1, 2011, the allocation of property tax revenues derived with respect to that property shall be subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 100.9.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Board of Equalization may amend the tax rolls for the 2010–11 fiscal year in order to provide the allocations required by paragraph (1).

(m) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision apply for the 2007–08 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.

(n) The
 amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision apply for the 2010–11 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 710, Sec. 1.   (SB 536)   Effective October 9, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

100.01.

Commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year, the aggregate assessed value of all county-assessed property rights or interests as described in Section 401.8 shall be assigned to a separate, countywide tax rate area. The tax rate to be applied to this assessed value shall be the sum of the two rates determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 100, and the property tax revenues so derived shall be allocated in accordance with the allocation procedures set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 32, Sec. 1.   Effective June 28, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

100.05.

Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 25.5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution is hereby suspended for the 2009–10 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

100.06.

(a) In accordance with the suspension under Section 100.05 of the Revenue and Taxation Code of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 25.5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, the county auditor shall, for the 2009–10 fiscal year, do both of the following:

(1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) and subdivision (b), reduce the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be apportioned to a city, county, city and county, or a special district by 8 percent of the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue apportioned to that local agency for the 2008–09 fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of calculating the amount of an 8-percent reduction required by subparagraph (A), any amount required to be paid or allocated to a city, county, or city and county under Section 97.68 or 97.70 for the 2008–09 fiscal year is included in determining the total amount of property tax revenue apportioned to that local agency for that fiscal year. A reduction made pursuant to this paragraph shall not, however, be made from any amount that is to be apportioned to a city, county, or city and county as a result of Section 97.68.

(2) Transfer to the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund, hereby established in the county treasury for administration by the county office of education as provided in subdivision (c), an amount equal in the aggregate to that portion of the total amount of reductions required by paragraph (1). The aggregate amount of transfers required by this
 paragraph shall be made in two equal shares, with the first share being transferred on January 15, 2010, and the second share being transferred on May 3, 2010.

(b) (1) Upon written request by a local agency that is received no later than 30 days after the issuance on bonds under Section 6590 of the Government Code or December 1, 2009, whichever date is earlier, the Director of Finance may, on the basis of extreme hardship and only to the extent that the agency did not receive bond proceeds for the full amount of Proposition 1A receivables that it offered for sale under Section 6588.6, decrease the reduction amount that would otherwise be applied to that local agency under subdivision (a). In evaluating a written request for a decrease, the Director of Finance may consider factors including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Whether the requesting
 local agency is the subject of a current bankruptcy proceeding, or whether incurring the full reduction amount otherwise required by subdivision (a) would likely cause the local agency to seek bankruptcy protection.

(B) Whether the requesting local agency has any financial reserves, and whether incurring the full reduction amount otherwise required by subdivision (a) would impair the ability of the local agency to provide a basic level of core public services.

(2) (A) If the Director of Finance approves a request made pursuant to paragraph (1), he or she shall, by December 10, 2009, certify to the auditor of the county in which the requesting local agency is located, the amount of a decrease in the reduction otherwise to be incurred by the requesting local agency pursuant to subdivision (a). The amount of that decrease shall be applied in proportionate shares
 to increase the reduction amounts under subdivision (a) of all other local agencies in the county, so that there is no decrease in the aggregate amount of reductions to be incurred by local agencies located in the county. The Director of Finance may determine that the reduction amount that would otherwise be incurred by the requesting local agency under subdivision (a) should be decreased to zero. The amount of any certified decrease, in whole or in part, of a reduction amount shall be based upon the director’s evaluation of the factors considered with respect to the requesting local agency under paragraph (1) and the extent to which those factors indicate that the requesting local agency should be given relief.

(B) The Director of Finance may not grant decreases to local agencies within a single county that, in the aggregate, total more than 10 percent of the combined total of the reduction amounts under subdivision (a) for all local agencies
 in that county.

(3) (A) Two or more local agencies in a county may agree to reallocate exclusively among themselves all or part of their reduction amounts otherwise required by this section. Any local agencies entering into an agreement to so reallocate their reduction amounts shall, no later than November 2, 2009, notify the county auditor of that agreement and the reallocations specified in that agreement, except that these agreements may be entered into after November 2, 2009, with respect to any Proposition 1A receivable created pursuant to paragraph (2). The auditor shall thereafter implement subdivision (a) with respect to those local agencies in accordance with that agreement.

(B) A redevelopment agency that will, on behalf of the city, city and county, or county under Section 33681.12 of the Health and Safety Code, pay all or a portion of a reduction
 amount under subdivision (a) shall so notify the county auditor by November 2, 2009. The auditor shall thereafter decrease the city’s, city and county’s, or county’s reduction amount by the amount of the payment from the city, city and county, or county redevelopment agency to the extent that the payment is received prior to a date by which a transfer is required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Except for those moneys subject to paragraph (3), the moneys in the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund shall be transferred by the county office of education to the Controller, in amounts and for those purposes as directed by the Director of Finance, exclusively to reimburse the state for the costs of providing health care, trial court, correctional, or other state-funded services and costs, until those moneys are exhausted. Moneys in a Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund shall be transferred to reimburse only
 those costs incurred, and the costs of services provided, in the county in which those moneys are collected.

(2) (A) Entities of state government, including the Administrative Office of the Courts, that are responsible for the functions funded with moneys transferred pursuant to paragraph (1) shall keep records, as required by the Department of Finance, of expenditures made in the county pursuant to that paragraph, and shall provide to the Department of Finance any information required by the department with respect to those expenditures.

(B) Moneys transferred pursuant to paragraph (1) for the funding of trial courts shall reimburse transfers from the state General Fund to the Trial Court Trust Fund.

(C) The county office of education shall make a transfer under paragraph (1) within five days
 of that transfer being directed by the Department of Finance, and shall provide to the Controller, with that transfer, information specifying the purpose of that transfer.

(D) Moneys in the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund that are not transferred in a fiscal year and are not subject to paragraph (3) shall be retained in the fund for transfer pursuant to paragraph (1) in a subsequent fiscal year.

(3) Any moneys in the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund that are determined by the Director of Finance not to be necessary to fund the provision of state-funded services and costs shall be transferred to the county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund, no later than June 1, 2010. Funds transferred to the county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to this paragraph shall not be apportioned to community college districts. This paragraph shall not be construed to
 increase any allocations of excess, additional, or remaining funds that would otherwise have been allocated to cities, counties, cities and counties, or special districts pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 of, clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 of, or Article 4 (commencing with Section 98) of Chapter 6 of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of, the Revenue and Taxation Code had this section not been enacted.

(4) (A) Each county auditor shall report to the Department of Finance the amount of property tax revenue that was transferred from each local agency located in the county to the county’s Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund. The county auditor first shall report this information on or before January 15, 2010, and then on or before May 15, 2010, and shall provide a copy of each report to each local agency located in the
 county.

(B) When transferring the amounts required by paragraph (1), each county auditor shall also provide the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and each local agency located in the county with information detailing how each local agency’s reduction amount under subdivision (a) was calculated. This information shall first be reported on or before January 15, 2010, and then on or before May 15, 2010.

(d) For the 2010–11 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the county auditor shall apportion ad valorem property tax to cities, counties, cities and counties and special districts without regard to the changes in property tax revenue apportionments required by this section.

(e) (1) In accordance with Section 25.5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, the state
 shall fully reimburse the revenue reductions incurred pursuant to subdivision (a) no earlier than June 6, 2013, except as allowed by paragraph (2), but not later than June 13, 2013, as provided in the terms and conditions of the sale of the bonds authorized by Section 6591 of the Government Code, in the following amounts determined by the Controller:

(A) (i) The amount due to the authority that issued bonds pursuant to Section 6590 of the Government Code to purchase Proposition 1A receivables pursuant to Section 6588.6 of the Government Code shall be paid and calculated as follows:

(I) The principal amount of the bonds on the date of the maturity or upon call.

(II) Periodic interest on the bonds as applicable, except that if the bonds sold pursuant to Section 6590 of the Government Code bear
 interest on periodic interest payment dates pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 6591 of the Government Code, the state shall pay periodic interest payments on or before each interest payment date.

(III) The accrued interest on the bonds upon call, on the date of maturity, or a later date, if repayment does not occur prior to the date of maturity.

(ii) The repayment date shall be certified by the Treasurer and the Director of Finance at the time of approval of the terms of the bonds pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (x) of Section 6588 of the Government Code and shall be specified in the documents pursuant to which the bonds are issued. Upon certification of that repayment date, as provided in this subdivision, the obligation of the state to make payment on that date shall be deemed an obligation imposed by law.

(iii) In the event the state fully repays the reduction amounts in accordance with paragraph (2) prior to the maturity date of the bonds, the payment amount shall be equal to the amount required, as shown in a report of an independent certified public accountant provided by the authority, to legally defease the bonds.

(B) The amount due to each local agency that does not sell all of its Proposition 1A receivables to an authority described in subparagraph (A) or to purchasers of Proposition 1A receivables pursuant to Section 53610 of the Government Code shall be the sum of both of the following:

(i) The unpaid principal amount of the revenue reduction incurred by each local agency pursuant to subdivision (a), less the amount of the revenue reduction that is attributable to Proposition 1A receivables that are sold to an authority described in subparagraph (A).

(ii) Interest on the amount described in clause (i) from the time of each revenue reduction pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), at a rate, set by the Department of Finance no later than 60 days after the operative date of this section, that is higher than the rate of interest earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account but no greater than 6 percent.

(2) The state may repay the revenue reductions incurred pursuant to subdivision (a) before June 6, 2013, upon the order of the Director of Finance issued no earlier than 30 days after delivery of a written notice of the intent to do so to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(3) The payment of the amounts specified in this subdivision shall take priority over all other obligations of the state in any fiscal year in which those payments are due, excepting
 payments to schools under Article XVI of the California Constitution and debt service on general obligation bonds. The Controller shall take all prudent means within his or her legal discretion to assure that sufficient sums are available to pay these amounts and all other obligations of higher priority.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated to the Controller from the General Fund, without regard to fiscal year, those amounts sufficient to pay the amounts specified in this subdivision.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if by June 30, 2013, the state has not fully reimbursed each local agency for its revenue reduction incurred pursuant subdivision (a) in the amounts as required by subdivision (e), the issuer of any bonds issued pursuant to subdivision (x) of Section 6588 of the Government Code,
 or any local agency that did not participate in the sale of Proposition 1A receivables pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (x) of Section 6588 of the Government Code, may seek a writ of mandamus to compel the Controller to fully pay the amounts the state is obligated to pay under subdivision (e) and Section 25.5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. A petition seeking a writ of mandamus pursuant to this subdivision, and any appellate proceedings arising from that action, shall have priority and preference in setting and review in furtherance of the repayment deadline mandated by Section 25.5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. A petition for a writ of mandamus authorized by this subdivision may also be filed in the California Supreme Court pursuant to that court’s original jurisdiction described in Section 10 of Article VI of the California Constitution.

(2) In authorizing an original mandamus petition to the
 California Supreme Court pursuant to this paragraph, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The Legislature is expressly required by Section 25.5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution to enact a statute mandating the full and timely repayment, as provided by subdivision (e), of any revenue reduction incurred by a local agency pursuant to subdivision (a) and all accrued interest thereon.

(B) Full and timely repayment of any revenue reduction incurred by a local agency pursuant to subdivision (a), with interest, is critical to every local agency from which those funds were diverted.
